Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.130

Immunization program—Superintendent of public instruction to provide information.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide for information about the immunization program and requirements under RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 to be widely available throughout the state in order to promote full use of the program.

[ 1990 c 33 s 197; 1985 c 49 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.31.115.]